parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-places.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     place names and adjectives
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj

+Place

+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


LEXICON ROOT 


!# places names

Circo% Massimo+Prop+Place		MSG;
Gran% Paradiso+Prop+Place		MSG;
Louvre+Prop+Place			MSG;
Fosse% Ardeatine+Prop+Place		FPL;
Cappella% Sistina+Prop+Place		FSG;
Casa% Bianca+Prop+Place			FSG;
Uffizi+Prop+Place			MPL;
Campidoglio+Prop+Place			MSG;
Rebibbia+Prop+Place			FSG;
Quirinale+Prop+Place			MSG;
Regina% Coeli+Prop+Place		MSG;
San% Vittore+Prop+Place			MSG;
Ucciardone+Prop+Place			MSG;
Viminale+Prop+Place			MSG;
Wembley+Prop+Place			MSG;
Wimbledon+Prop+Place			MSG;	
Maracanà+Prop+Place			MSG;
Palazzo% Madama+Prop+Place		MSG;
Palazzo% di% vetro+Prop+Place		MSG;
Sapienza+Prop+Place			FSG;
Piazza% San% Marco+Prop+Place		FSG;

!# place Adjectives

Mondiale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Internazionale+Adj+Place		MFSGPL;
Europeo+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Nazionale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Interregionale+Adj+Place		MFSGPL;
Regionale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Provinciale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Comunale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;
Municipale+Adj+Place			MFSGPL;






!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;
